Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6388.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Purpose.
The general assembly hereby finds that the casino gaming industry is an important source
of revenue and jobs for the State of Rhode Island. The purpose of this act is to position Rhode
Island as a nationwide leader in the online casino gaming industry, thereby creating additional jobs
for Rhode Island residents and strengthening the economy and profile of the state.
SECTION 2. Chapter 42-61.2 of the General Laws entitled "Video Lottery Games, Table
Games and Sports Wagering" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-61.2-19. External online casino gaming.
(a) Definitions. As used in this section, in addition to the definitions spelled out below,
terms referenced in this section shall have the meanings given them in § 42-61.2-1.
(1) "External game play activities" means the operation and hosting by Twin River and/or
Twin River-Tiverton and/or their permitted assignees in external jurisdictions and the playing of
external online table games in external jurisdictions in accordance with the laws of the applicable
external jurisdictions, where: game-play outcomes are generated based on the images of gaming-
related activities livestreamed to external jurisdictions; electronic wallets are maintained in the
applicable external jurisdictions; wagers are placed, accepted, logged, and processed on servers
located in one or more external jurisdictions; prizes are paid and received in one or more external
jurisdictions; and the game play activities of players in the external jurisdictions do not affect in

any way the online table game activities in Rhode Island.
(2) "External jurisdiction" means any jurisdiction located outside of the State of Rhode
Island which permits external game play activities, that is authorized by the division in accordance
with the provisions of this section; provided, however, it shall not include any jurisdiction that
competes with the revenue generating operations of the division, as determined by the division in
its sole discretion.
(3) "External online table game" means a casino-style table game authorized by an external
jurisdiction made available to players in that jurisdiction through use of the Internet utilizing
computers, mobile applications on mobile devices, or other interactive devices, on which wagers
are accepted by a gaming system located in an external jurisdiction, and where the outcomes of
such games are generated by gaming-related activities taking place in a hosting facility.
(4) "Gaming-related activities" means activities approved by the division, in its sole
discretion, for livestreaming conducted by a live person in a hosting facility and communicated via
the live studio RGS, for the purpose of generating information and outcomes to be used in the
operation of external online table games, including activities such as rolling dice, dealing cards, or
spinning roulette wheels.
(5) "Live studio RGS" means a remote game server physically located in a hosting facility
which transmits, via livestream, gaming-related activities occurring in that hosting facility to an
external jurisdiction.
(6) "Livestream" means the video imagery of gaming-related activities recorded on
cameras in a hosting facility and streamed live to external jurisdictions via a live studio RGS.
(b) Authorization of external game play activities. Notwithstanding any provisions of the
general laws or regulations adopted thereunder to the contrary including, without limitation, the
provisions of chapter 19 of title 11, chapters 1 through 11 of title 41, and chapters 61, 61.2, and
61.3 of title 42, the division is hereby directed to permit Twin River, Twin River-Tiverton, or both
to livestream gaming-related activities to one or more external jurisdictions for the purpose of
facilitating external game play activities, subject to the conditions set forth in subsections (b)(1) to
(b)(4) of this section.
(1) The division shall determine whether the external game play activities are permitted in
the external jurisdiction and any conditions related thereto in connection with authorizing the
livestreaming of gaming-related activities to an external jurisdiction. Twin River, Twin River-
Tiverton, or both, as applicable, shall be responsible for and reimburse the division for any costs
and fees, including, without limitation, attorneys' fees, associated with the division's compliance
with this subsection.
LC003011 - Page 2 of 4

(2) Twin River, Twin River-Tiverton, or both, as applicable, shall indemnify and hold the
state harmless from and against any claims, costs, penalties, demands, losses, liabilities, damages,
judgments, fines, or fees (including reasonable attorneys' fees) related, directly or indirectly, to the
livestreaming of gaming-related activities to an external jurisdiction.
(3) Twin River, Twin River-Tiverton, or both, as applicable, shall not assign, resell, pledge,
license, or otherwise transfer its permission to livestream gaming-related activities to external
jurisdictions to any other person or entity other than Bally's Corporation, a Delaware corporation,
or an affiliate of Bally's. For purposes of this subsection: "affiliate" means a person who or that
directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is under
common control with a person; and "control" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the
power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through
the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003011
========
LC003011 - Page 3 of 4